Maryland, session 2025, HB0633.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
12–301.
In this subtitle:
(3) “slot machine” does not include a machine, apparatus, or device that:
(i) awards the user only free additional games or plays;
(ii) awards the user only noncash merchandise or noncash prizes of
minimal value;
(iii) dispenses paper pull tab tip jar tickets or paper pull tab instant
bingo tickets that must be opened manually by the user provided that the machine,
apparatus, or device does not:
1. read the tickets electronically;
2. alert the user to a winning or losing ticket; or
3. tabulate a player’s winnings and losses;
– 1 –

Ch. 290 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iv) 1. is a handheld device that displays only facsimiles of bingo
cards that an individual uses to mark and monitor contemporaneously to a live call of bingo
numbers called on the premises by an individual where the user is operating the machine;
2. does not permit a user to play more than 54 bingo cards at
the same time;
3. does not randomly generate any numbers; and
4. is not part of an integrated system;
(v) is used by the State Lottery and Gaming Control Commission
under Title 9 of the State Government Article;
(vi) if legislation takes effect authorizing the operation of video
lottery terminals, is a video lottery terminal as defined in and licensed under that
legislation;
(vii) is a skills–based amusement device that awards prizes [of],
MERCHANDISE, TICKETS, TOKENS, OR OTHER OBJECTS THAT:
1. PER PLAY, DO NOT EXCEED minimal value approved by
the State Lottery and Gaming Control Commission through regulation; [or] AND
2. MAY BE ACCUMULATED AND EXCHANGED FOR
NONCASH MERCHANDISE OR PRIZES OF VALUE THAT:
A. IS SIMILAR TO THE CUMULATED VALUE OF THE
OBJECTS EXCHANGED; AND
B. DOES NOT EXCEED A MINIMAL WHOLESALE VALUE OF
$599; OR
(viii) is a skills–based device that awards noncash merchandise and is
located at a family entertainment center in Worcester County licensed under § 9–1B–02 of
the State Government Article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 2 –